District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

10-1006

Sole source contracting.

Repealed.

History

Mar. 26, 1999, D.C. Law 12-175, § 1806a
as added Mar. 16, 2005, D.C. Law 15-238, § 2(b), 51 DCR 10599
Mar. 11, 2010, D.C. Law 18-115, § 3(b), 57 DCR 886
Sept. 14, 2011, D.C. Law 19-21, § 1032(a), 58 DCR 6226

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 2 of Office of Property Management Reform Emergency Amendment Act of 2004 (D.C. Act 15-453, June 23, 2004, 51 DCR 6726).
For temporary (90 day) addition of sections, see § 2 of Office of Property Management Reform Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2004 (D.C. Act 15-539, October 12, 2004, 51 DCR 9827).
For temporary (90 day) addition of sections, see § 2 of Office of Property Management Reform Second Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2004 (D.C. Act 15-756, January 19, 2005, 52 DCR 2293).
For temporary (90 day) repeal of section, see § 1012(a) of Fiscal Year 2012 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2011 (D.C. Act 19-93, June 29, 2011, 58 DCR 5599).